apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="dirich/ir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_imos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ise__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/itz__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_ir__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cu/llir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>lgo</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>llo</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lles</l>      <r>llir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>llen</l>      <r>llir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_imos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>llí</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>llí</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lg</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lg</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ise__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lg</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lg</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/itz__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_ir__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ll</l>        <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>lli</l>       <r>llir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="teixir">          <i>te</i><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acullir">         <i>acu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aflichir">        <i>aflich</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="atrevir">  <p><l>atrev</l>     <r>atriv</r></p><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bullir">          <i>bu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cullir">          <i>cu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exichir">  <p><l>desich</l>    <r>exich</r></p><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exichir">  <p><l>desix</l>     <r>exich</r></p><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dirichir">        <i>dirich</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encullir">        <i>encu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erichir">         <i>erich</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escullir">        <i>escu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exichir">  <p><l>esich</l>     <r>exich</r></p><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="exichir">  <p><l>esix</l>      <r>exich</r></p><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="exichir">         <i>exich</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="finchir">         <i>finch</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="infrinchir">      <i>infrinch</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="planyir">         <i>plany</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recullir">        <i>recu</i><par n="cu/llir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restrinchir">     <i>restrinch</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ruchir">          <i>ruch</i><par n="dirich/ir__vblex"/></e>
